Idaho statutes. Title 37 FOOD, DRUGS, AND OIL
Chapter 19
MEAT INSPECTION

Sec.

§ 37-1901. Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1902. Inspection requirements

Purpose. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1903. Inspection of animals to be slaughtered. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1904. Post-mortem inspection. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1905. Application of inspection provisions. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1906. Inspection of meat food products

Labeling. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1907. Label on container. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1908. Inspection of sanitary conditions. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1909. Inspection during nighttime. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1910. Prohibitions. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1911. Official marks — Authorization by director

Prohibitions. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1912. Sale or transportation of improperly labeled meat prohibited

Slaughter and preparation in separate establishments. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1913. Inspectors — Appointment

Duties. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1914. Bribery

Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1915. Exceptions to inspection requirement. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1916. Storage regulations. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1917. Animals not intended as human food. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1918. Records required. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1919. Registration of businesses. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1920. Buying, selling or transporting dead animals

Regulations. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1921. State agency to cooperate with federal authorities. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1922. Refusal of, withdrawal of inspection services. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1923. Detention. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1924. Seizure of contraband — Condemnation — Release and disposal

Right to jury trial. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1925. Jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1926. Forcible interference

Penalty. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1927. Violations of law

Penalties. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1928. Additional powers of director — Hearings — Refusal to attend or testify — False statements — Failure to file reports — Unauthorized disclosure of information

Penalties. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1929. Application of law to federally inspected plants. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1930. State brand board

Powers. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1931. No fee for inspection — Overtime pay

Disposition of fees. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1932. Title of act. [Repealed.]

§ 37-1933 — 37-1935. Penalties — Suspension or failure of licensee to conform to act — Fees. [Repealed.]